fr: Type d’égaliseur: Analogique; Amplificateur de basses; Restaurateur de basses; Numérique; Dynamique; Graphique; Phase linéaire; Multi-mode; Coupe-bande; Paragraphique; Paramétrique; Programme (style Pultec); Semi-paramétrique; Plateau (Baxandall); Éditeur spectral; Autre
da: Equalizer-type: Analog; Basforstærker; Basgenskaber; Digital; Dynamisk; Grafisk; Lineær fase; Multi-mode; Notch; Paragrafisk; Parametrisk; Program (Pultec-stil); Semi-parametrisk; Shelving (Baxandall); Spektral editor; Andet
fi: Taajuuskorjaimen tyyppi: Analoginen; Basson tehostin; Basson palautin; Digitaalinen; Dynaaminen; Graafinen; Lineaarivaihe; Monitila; Kaistanestin; Paragraafinen; Parametrinen; Ohjelma (Pultec-tyylinen); Puoliparametrinen; Hyllytasaus (Baxandall); Spektrieditori; Muu
nb: Equalizer type: Analog; Bassforsterker; Bassgjenoppretter; Digital; Dynamisk; Grafisk; Lineærfase; Multimodus; Notch; Paragrafisk; Parametrisk; Program (Pultec-stil); Semi-parametrisk; Shelving (Baxandall); Spektral editor; Annet
pt-BR: Tipo de equalizador: Analógico; Realçador de graves; Restaurador de graves; Digital; Dinâmico; Gráfico; Fase linear; Multimodo; Notch; Paragráfico; Paramétrico; Programa (estilo Pultec); Semiparamétrico; Shelving (Baxandall); Editor espectral; Outro
nl: Equalizer type: Analoog; Basversterker; Bashersteller; Digitaal; Dynamisch; Grafisch; Lineaire fase; Multi-modus; Notch; Paragrafisch; Parametrisch; Programma (Pultec-stijl); Semi-parametrisch; Shelving (Baxandall); Spectrale editor; Andere
bg-BG: Тип еквалайзер: Аналогов; Усилвател на баси; Възстановител на баси; Цифрова; Динамичен; Графичен; Линейно фазов; Многорежимен; Режекторен; Параграфичен; Параметричен; Програмен (Pultec стил); Полупараметричен; Полков (Baxandall); Спектрален редактор; Други
it: Tipo di equalizzatore: Analogico; Esaltatore dei bassi; Ripristinatore dei bassi; Digitale; Dinamica; Grafico; Fase lineare; Multi-modalità; Notch; Paragrafico; Parametrico; Programma (stile Pultec); Semi-parametrico; Shelving (Baxandall); Editor spettrale; Altro
es: Tipo de ecualizador: Analógico; Realzador de graves; Restaurador de graves; Digital; Dinámico; Gráfico; Fase lineal; Multimodo; Muesca; Paragráfico; Paramétrico; Programa (estilo Pultec); Semiparamétrico; Shelving (Baxandall); Editor espectral; Otros
sv: Equalizertyp: Analog; Basförstärkare; Basåterställare; Digitalt; Dynamisk; Grafisk; Linjär fas; Multiläge; Notchfilter; Paragrafisk; Parametrisk; Program (Pultec-stil); Semi-parametrisk; Shelving (Baxandall); Spektralredigerare; Övrigt
de: Equalizer-Typ: Analog; Bass-Verstärker; Bass-Restaurator; Digital; Dynamisch; Grafisch; Linearphasig; Multimodus; Notch; Paragrafisch; Parametrisch; Programm (Pultec-Stil); Semi-parametrisch; Shelving (Baxandall); Spektral-Editor; Sonstiges
lt-LT: Ekvalaizerio tipas: Analoginis; Žemų dažnių stiprintuvas; Žemų dažnių atkūrimas; Skaitmeninis; Dinaminis; Grafinis; Tiesinės fazės; Daugiafunkcis; Sąsmaukos; Paragrafinis; Parametrinis; Programinis (Pultec stiliaus); Pusiau parametrinis; Lentyninis (Baxandall); Spektrinis redaktorius; Kita
pl: Typ equalizera: Analogowy; Wzmacniacz basów; Odtwarzacz basów; Cyfrowy; Dynamiczny; Graficzny; Liniowa faza; Wielotryb; Filtr wycinający; Paragraficzny; Parametryczny; Programowy (styl Pultec); Półparametryczny; Półkowy (Baxandall); Edytor widma; Inne
cs: Typ ekvalizéru: Analogový; Zesilovač basů; Obnova basů; Digitální; Dynamický; Grafický; Lineární fáze; Víceúčelový; Pásmová zádrž; Paragrafický; Parametrický; Program (styl Pultec); Semiparametrický; Shelving (Baxandall); Spektrální editor; Jiné
sk-SK: Typ ekvalizéra: Analógový; Zosilňovač basov; Obnovič basov; Digitálny; Dynamický; Grafický; Lineárna fáza; Multi-režimový; Zárezový; Paragrafický; Parametrický; Programový (Pultec štýl); Semiparametrický; Pásmový (Baxandall); Spektrálny editor; Iné
en: Equalizer type: Analog; Bass enhancer; Bass restorer; Digital; Dynamic; Graphic; Linear phase; Multi-mode; Notch; Paragraphic; Parametric; Program (Pultec-style); Semi-parametric; Shelving (Baxandall); Spectral editor; Other
ru: Тип эквалайзера: Аналоговые; Усилитель басов; Восстановитель басов; Цифровые; Динамический; Графический; Линейная фаза; Многорежимный; Вырезной; Параграфический; Параметрический; Программный (в стиле Pultec); Полупараметрический; Полочный (Baxandall); Спектральный редактор; Другой
sl-SI: Tip izenačevalnika: Analogna; Ojačevalnik basov; Obnovitelj basov; Digitalna; Dinamični; Grafični; Linearna faza; Večnačinski; Zarezni; Paragrafski; Parametrični; Programski (Pultec slog); Polparametrični; Policni (Baxandall); Spektralni urejevalnik; Drugo
hr-HR: Vrsta ekvilajzera: Analogni; Pojačivač basa; Obnavljač basa; Digitalna; Dinamički; Grafički; Linearna faza; Višenačinski; Urezni; Paragrafski; Parametarski; Programski (Pultec stil); Polu-parametarski; Polični (Baxandall); Spektralni uređivač; Ostalo
ro-RO: Tip egalizator: Analogic; Amplificator de bass; Restaurator de bass; Digital; Dinamic; Grafic; Fază liniară; Multi-mod; Notch; Paragrafic; Parametric; Program (stil Pultec); Semi-parametric; Shelving (Baxandall); Editor spectral; Altele
zh-TW: 等化器類型: 類比; 低音增強器; 低音還原器; 數位; 動圈式; 圖示式; 線性相位; 多模式; 陷波式; 準參數式; 參數式; 程序式（Pultec 風格）; 半參數式; 擱架式（Baxandall）; 頻譜編輯器; 其他
zh-CN: 均衡器类型: 模拟; 低音增强器; 低音修复器; 数字版; 动圈式; 图示; 线性相位; 多模式; 陷波; 准参量; 参量; 程序（Pultec 风格）; 半参量; 架式 (Baxandall); 频谱编辑器; 其他
pt-PT: Tipo de equalizador: Analógico; Melhorador de graves; Restaurador de graves; Digital; Dinâmico; Gráfico; Fase linear; Multi-modo; Filtro notch; Paragráfico; Paramétrico; Programa (estilo Pultec); Semi-paramétrico; Shelving (Baxandall); Editor espectral; Outro
vi: Loại bộ cân bằng: Analog; Tăng cường âm trầm; Phục hồi âm trầm; Kỹ thuật số; Động; Đồ họa; Pha tuyến tính; Đa chế độ; Lọc rãnh; Bán đồ họa; Tham số; Chương trình (kiểu Pultec); Bán tham số; Kiểu kệ (Baxandall); Trình chỉnh sửa phổ; Khác
tr: Ekolayzer tipi: Analog; Bas güçlendirici; Bas geri yükleyici; Dijital; Dinamik; Grafik; Doğrusal faz; Çok modlu; Çentik; Paragrafik; Parametrik; Program (Pultec tarzı); Yarı parametrik; Raf tipi (Baxandall); Spektral editör; Diğer
hu: Kiegyenlítőtípus: Analóg; Basszuskiemelő; Basszus helyreállító; Digitális; Dinamikus; Grafikus; Lineáris fázisú; Többmódú; Lyukszűrős; Paragrafikus; Parametrikus; Program (Pultec-stílusú); Félparametrikus; Shelving (Baxandall); Spektrális szerkesztő; Egyéb
ja: イコライザータイプ: アナログ; ベースエンハンサー; ベースレストアラー; デジタル; ダイナミック; グラフィック; リニアフェーズ; マルチモード; ノッチ; パラグラフィック; パラメトリック; プログラム（Pultec スタイル）; セミパラメトリック; シェルビング（Baxandall）; スペクトラルエディター; その他
th: ประเภทอีควอไลเซอร์: อนาล็อก; ตัวเสริมเบส; ตัวฟื้นฟูเบส; ดิจิทัล; ไดนามิก; กราฟฟิก; ลิเนียร์เฟส; มัลติโหมด; น็อตช์; พาราฟิก; พาราเมตริก; โปรแกรม (สไตล์พัลเทค); เซมิพาราเมตริก; เชลฟ์วิง (แบ็กซ์แอนดัล); สเปกตรัมเอดิเตอร์; อื่นๆ
el: Τύπος ισοσταθμιστή: Αναλογικό; Ενισχυτής μπάσων; Επαναφορά μπάσων; Ψηφιακό; Δυναμικό; Γραφικό; Γραμμική φάση; Πολλαπλών λειτουργιών; Notch; Παραγραφικό; Παραμετρικό; Προγράμματος (τύπου Pultec); Ημιπαραμετρικό; Shelving (Baxandall); Φασματικός επεξεργαστής; Άλλο
ko: 이퀄라이저 유형: 아날로그; 베이스 인핸서; 베이스 리스토러; 디지털; 다이나믹; 그래픽; 리니어 페이즈; 멀티 모드; 노치; 파라그래픽; 파라메트릭; 프로그램 (Pultec 스타일); 세미 파라메트릭; 쉘빙 (Baxandall); 스펙트럴 에디터; 기타